Utah statutes.
76-10-907.2.   Qualifications to sell to dealer.
(1)  A dealer may not purchase regulated metal from a person younger than 18
years of age.
(2)  If the person is unable to comply with all the identification
requirements of Subsection 76-10-907(2), the dealer may not conduct a
transaction of regulated metal with that person.
